Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-933.03
Contributing member; credit for service in other schools; limitation; procedure; payment.

(1) Under such rules and regulations as the board may adopt and promulgate, a contributing member under contract or employed on July 19, 1996, may receive credit for not to exceed ten years of creditable teaching service rendered in public schools in another state or schools in this state covered by a school retirement system established pursuant to section 79-979, if such member files an application for service credit within three years of membership or reinstatement in the School Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska and makes payment into the retirement system of an amount equal to the required deposits he or she would have paid had he or she been employed in this state by a school covered by the retirement system, plus the interest which would have accrued on such amount. Payment must be completed within five years of membership or reinstatement in the retirement system, or prior to termination of employment, whichever occurs first, and may be made through direct payment, installment payments, or an irrevocable payroll deduction authorization.

(2) A member who retires as a school employee of this state shall not receive credit for time in service outside of this state or in a school in this state covered by the school retirement system established pursuant to section 79-979 in excess of the time he or she has been in service as a school employee in this state of a school covered by the School Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska. The board shall refund to the member the payments made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to the extent that the member does not receive credit for such service.

(3) A member who purchases service credit pursuant to this section shall provide such documentation as the board may require to prove that the member has forfeited the receipt of any benefits from the retirement system of the public school in another state or a school in this state covered by a retirement system established pursuant to section 79-979 for the creditable service rendered in such school.

Laws 1996, LB 1076, § 22;

Laws 1997, LB 623, § 18;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 51;

Laws 1999, LB 703, § 10;

Laws 2011, LB509, § 24;

Laws 2018, LB1005, § 28.